Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2207.01
Assignment, defined.

Assignment means a valuation service that is performed by a real property appraiser as a consequence of an agreement with a client.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 9;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 56.